Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5724.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
CHAPTER XIIA
Sec. 18u. If a court-ordered treatment plan includes referring
a child to placement in a residential treatment program, the
department shall ensure that the child is placed with a residential
treatment program that has an adequate array of beds not more than
14 days after the referral.
Final Page
OOH H05811'25 (H-1) p8vauf